Arkansas, session 2025, HB1676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-110-413(a), concerning garnishment
against the state or a subdivision of the state after judgment, is amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1) Any indebtedness, goods and chattels, moneys, credits, or
effects, except for refunds for overpayment of Arkansas state income tax
belonging to a defendant in a civil action and in the hands or possession of
the State of Arkansas, or any subdivision thereof of the state, institution,
department, or special district or instrumentality of the State of Arkansas,
shall be subject to garnishment as is now provided by law.
(2) Nothing in subdivision Subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall be construed in any way to does not eliminate or limit the provisions
of § 26-36-301 et seq. concerning the set-off of debt owed to a state
*JLL263*
03/03/2025 6:19:19 PM JLL263

HB1676
program.



































03/03/2025 6:19:19 PM JLL263